Utah statutes.
53B-13-103.   Powers of Board of Regents.
The board has the powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter,
including the following:
(1)  to accept gifts, grants, loans, and other aids or amounts from a person,
corporation, or governmental agency;
(2)  to loan money to eligible borrowers to assist them in obtaining a post-
high school education by attending an eligible institution, including
refinancing or consolidating obligations previously incurred by eligible
borrowers with other lending sources for this purpose and participating in
loans to eligible borrowers for this purpose with other lending sources;
(3)  to acquire, purchase, or make commitments to purchase, and take
assignments from lenders of obligations.  No obligation is eligible for
acquisition, purchase, or commitment to purchase by the board unless at or
before the time of transfer to the board the lender certifies either: (a)
that, under and to the extent required by rules and regulations of the board,
the proceeds of sale or its equivalent shall be reinvested in other
obligations under the student loan program; or (b) that the obligation was
made in anticipation of its sale to the board under rules and regulations of
the board promulgated under this chapter;
(4)  to enforce its rights under a contract or agreement including the
commencement of court action;
(5)  to acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property necessary for
the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter;
(6)  to obtain insurance against losses which may be incurred in connection
with its property, assets, activities, or the exercise of the powers granted
under this chapter;
(7)  to borrow money and to issue its bonds and provide for the rights of
bondholders and to secure the bonds by assignment, pledge, or granting a
security interest in its property including all or a part of an obligation.
The state is not liable for the repayment of bonds issued by the board.  The
bonds issued by the board are not a debt of the state, and each bond shall
contain on its face a statement to this effect;
(8)  to invest funds not required for immediate use or disbursement as
provided in the State Money Management Act;
(9)  subject to a contract with the holders of its bonds, an applicable bond
resolution, or a contract with the recipient of a loan, to consent to the
modification, with respect to security, rate of interest, time of payment of
interest or principal, or other term of a bond contract or agreement between
the board and a recipient of a loan, bondholder, or agency or institution
guaranteeing the repayment of an obligation;
(10)  to engage and appoint officers, agents, employees, and other private
consultants to render and perform professional and technical duties,
assistance, and advice in carrying out the purposes of this chapter, to
describe their duties, and to fix the amount and source of their compensation;
(11)  to make rules and regulations governing the activities authorized under
this chapter;
(12)  to solicit grants and contributions from the public or from any
government or governmental agency and to arrange for the guaranteeing of the
repayment of obligations by other agencies of this state or the United States;
(13)  to collect fees and charges in connection with its loans, commitments,
and servicing, including reimbursement of the costs of financing, service
charges, and insurance premiums which are determined as reasonable and are
approved by the board;
(14)  to sell obligations held by the board at such prices and at such times
as it may determine, when that sale would not impair the rights or interests
of holders of bonds issued by the board; and
(15)  to participate in federal programs supporting loans to eligible
borrowers and to agree to, and comply with, the conditions of those programs.
